South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S973.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-51-90(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The defaulting taxpayer or any other individual or entity, any grantee from the owner, or any mortgage or judgment creditor may within twelve months from the date of the delinquent tax sale redeem each item of real estate by paying to the person officially charged with the collection of delinquent taxes, assessments, penalties, and costs, together with interest as provided in subsection (B) of this section. If prior to the expiration of the redemption period, the purchaser assigns his interest in any real property purchased at a delinquent tax sale, the grantee from the successful bidder shall furnish the person officially charged with the collection of delinquent taxes a conveyance, witnessed and notarized. The person officially charged with the collection of delinquent taxes shall replace the successful bidder's name and address with the grantee's name and address in the delinquent tax sale book. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----